Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-806
Sections; when inapplicable.

In the event that the ownership of all the land used for drainage construction and of all the land forming the shoreline and the bed of said lake or lakes is vested in the person performing said work of drainage or diversion, the provisions of sections 46-801 to 46-807 do not apply.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, § 6, p. 859;

C.S.1922, § 8485;

C.S.1929, § 81-6406;

R.S.1943, § 81-707.